Washington statutes.
RCW 15.100.120

Establishment of commission and initial assessment—Statewide referendum among producers.

(1) For purposes of determining producer participation in the commission, the initial election of commissioners, and for imposition of the original assessment specified in RCW 15.100.110, the director shall conduct a referendum among all producers of forest products within the state.

(2) The requirement for approval of the assessment and creation of the commission is met if: (a) At least fifty-one percent by numbers of producers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively, and these producers represent at least sixty-one percent of the volume of the producers replying in the referendum; or (b) sixty-five percent by numbers of producers replying in the referendum vote affirmatively, and these producers represent at least fifty-one percent of the volume of the producers replying in the referendum. The referendum shall only be approved if at least forty percent of the eligible producers participate in the vote.

(3) If the director determines that the requisite approval has been given, the director shall declare the establishment of the commission and direct it to put into force the assessment authorized in RCW 15.100.110. If the director finds that the requisite approval has not been given, then this chapter is not operative.

[ 2001 c 314 s 12.]